Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
125C

PROCUREMENT,
CONTROL, DISTRIBUTION AND SALE OF

PETROLEUM
PRODUCTS

Part I. General Powers and Procedures

During a Shortage

Section

125C-1 Findings and purpose

125C-2 "Shortage" defined

125C-3 Powers in a shortage

125C-4 Adopting, filing, and taking effect of
rules

125C-5 Publication of rules and declarations

125C-6 Petition for adoption, amendment, repeal,

or suspension of rules

125C-7 Repealed

125C-8 Personnel; delegation of powers

125C-9 Investigations and surveys

125C-10 Fraud; misdemeanor

125C-11 Repealed

Part II. Hardship Set-Aside and Allocation
of

Petroleum Products During a
Shortage

125C-21 Definitions

125C-22 When set-aside required

125C-23 Set-aside system

Part III. Energy Emergency Planning

125C-31 Biennial state energy emergency
preparedness plan

125C-32 Biennial county energy emergency
preparedness plans

Cross References

Energy industry information reporting, see chapter 486J.

Unfair trade practices by petroleum industry, see chapter
486B.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next